Missouri, session 2026, SB1742.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 389, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 389.1200, to read as
follows:
389.1200. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Crew member", an employee of the railroad carrier
involved in the operation of a railroad train or light
engine. The term does not include hostler service, helper
service, or utility employees or contractors;
(2) "Helper service", the use of one or more
locomotives to assist another train experiencing mechanical
failure or lacking sufficient power to traverse difficult
terrain, including travel to and from the point of
assistance;
(3) "Hostler service", the movement of locomotives not
attached to rail cars within a rail yard.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section,
a railroad train or light engine used in connection with the
movement of freight shall be operated by a crew consisting
of not fewer than two qualified crew members.

SB 1742 2
3. The two-person crew requirement shall not apply to:
(1) Helper services;
(2) Hostler services; or
(3) The movement of a train for the purpose of loading
or unloading freight, provided the train is operated at a
speed not exceeding ten miles per hour.
4. Any person or railroad carrier who willfully
violates subsection 2 of this section shall be subject to
the following penalties:
(1) For a first offense, a fine not to exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars;
(2) For a second offense, a fine not to exceed five
thousand dollars;
(3) For a third or subsequent offense, a fine not to
exceed ten thousand dollars.
5. This section shall not be construed to conflict
with federal regulations governing railroad crew staffing.
6. The department of transportation shall have
authority to enforce this section and may promulgate rules
to carry out its provisions. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.

SB 1742 3
7. The enactment of this section shall become
effective only upon notification to the revisor of statutes
by the attorney general of Missouri that a final judgment
that affirms the validity of the Federal Railroad
Administration's two-person crew rule has been entered.
✓